Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,102
Interest on general pecuniary devise.

General pecuniary devises bear interest at the legal rate beginning one year after the first appointment of a personal representative until payment, unless a contrary intent is indicated by the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 180, UPC § 3-904.

A will is an instrument in writing. Therefore, when interest is required to be paid on a pecuniary devise pursuant to this section, the legal rate of interest called for is 12 percent per annum, as required by section 45-104. In re Estate of Peterson, 230 Neb. 744, 433 N.W.2d 500 (1988).